Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1730 N 1
SFX 1730 0 ueuil .

SFX 1731 N 1
SFX 1731 0 uga .

SFX 1732 N 1
SFX 1732 0 ugal .

SFX 1733 N 1
SFX 1733 0 ugh .

SFX 1734 N 1
SFX 1734 0 ugu .

SFX 1735 N 1
SFX 1735 0 uguesa .

SFX 1736 N 1
SFX 1736 0 ujiang .

SFX 1737 N 1
SFX 1737 0 ul .

SFX 1738 N 1
SFX 1738 0 ulia .

SFX 1739 N 1
SFX 1739 0 ulipas .

SFX 1740 N 1
SFX 1740 0 umberland .

SFX 1741 N 1
SFX 1741 0 un .

SFX 1742 N 1
SFX 1742 0 up .

SFX 1743 N 1
SFX 1743 0 uquan .

SFX 1744 N 1
SFX 1744 0 uquerque .

SFX 1745 N 1
SFX 1745 0 ur .

SFX 1746 N 1
SFX 1746 0 ura .

SFX 1747 N 1
SFX 1747 0 urbanne .

SFX 1748 N 1
SFX 1748 0 uru .

SFX 1749 N 1
SFX 1749 0 uruan .

SFX 1750 N 1
SFX 1750 0 usand .

SFX 1751 N 1
SFX 1751 0 ushuke .

SFX 1752 N 1
SFX 1752 0 utai .

SFX 1753 N 1
SFX 1753 0 utepec .

SFX 1754 N 1
SFX 1754 0 utlen .

SFX 1755 N 1
SFX 1755 0 utsman .

SFX 1756 N 1
SFX 1756 0 uttgart .

SFX 1757 N 1
SFX 1757 0 utu .

SFX 1758 N 1
SFX 1758 0 uy .

SFX 1759 N 1
SFX 1759 0 uya .

SFX 1760 N 1
SFX 1760 0 valle .

SFX 1761 N 1
SFX 1761 0 vapai .

SFX 1762 N 1
SFX 1762 0 vatmal .

SFX 1763 N 1
SFX 1763 0 ve .

SFX 1764 N 1
SFX 1764 0 ventura .

SFX 1765 N 1
SFX 1765 0 vica .

SFX 1766 N 1
SFX 1766 0 vicencio .

SFX 1767 N 1
SFX 1767 0 vie .

SFX 1768 N 1
SFX 1768 0 vigado .

SFX 1769 N 1
SFX 1769 0 ville .

SFX 1770 N 1
SFX 1770 0 viyani .

SFX 1771 N 1
SFX 1771 0 vo .

SFX 1772 N 1
SFX 1772 0 vpuri .

SFX 1773 N 1
SFX 1773 0 waka .

SFX 1774 N 1
SFX 1774 0 wakarta .

SFX 1775 N 1
SFX 1775 0 wal .

SFX 1776 N 1
SFX 1776 0 wall .

SFX 1777 N 1
SFX 1777 0 wang .

SFX 1778 N 1
SFX 1778 0 wano .

SFX 1779 N 1
SFX 1779 0 ward .

SFX 1780 N 1
SFX 1780 0 water .

SFX 1781 N 1
SFX 1781 0 way .

SFX 1782 N 1
SFX 1782 0 we .

SFX 1783 N 1
SFX 1783 0 wei .

SFX 1784 N 1
SFX 1784 0 well .

SFX 1785 N 1
SFX 1785 0 west .

SFX 1786 N 1
SFX 1786 0 widdie .

SFX 1787 N 1
SFX 1787 0 wied .

SFX 1788 N 1
SFX 1788 0 win .

SFX 1789 N 1
SFX 1789 0 wnee .

SFX 1790 N 1
SFX 1790 0 wodadi .

SFX 1791 N 1
SFX 1791 0 wokerto .

SFX 1792 N 1
SFX 1792 0 wood .

SFX 1793 N 1
SFX 1793 0 wu .

SFX 1794 N 1
SFX 1794 0 xi .

SFX 1795 N 1
SFX 1795 0 xia .

SFX 1796 N 1
SFX 1796 0 xiang .

SFX 1797 N 1
SFX 1797 0 xlokk .

SFX 1798 N 1
SFX 1798 0 xue .

SFX 1799 N 1
SFX 1799 0 y .

SFX 1800 N 1
SFX 1800 0 ya .

SFX 1801 N 1
SFX 1801 0 yama .

SFX 1802 N 1
SFX 1802 0 yan .

SFX 1803 N 1
SFX 1803 0 yang .

SFX 1804 N 1
SFX 1804 0 yao .

SFX 1805 N 1
SFX 1805 0 yapet .

SFX 1806 N 1
SFX 1806 0 yaphum .

SFX 1807 N 1
SFX 1807 0 ye .

SFX 1808 N 1
SFX 1808 0 yi .

SFX 1809 N 1
SFX 1809 0 yin .

SFX 1810 N 1
SFX 1810 0 yishan .

SFX 1811 N 1
SFX 1811 0 yk .

SFX 1812 N 1
SFX 1812 0 yohi .

SFX 1813 N 1
SFX 1813 0 you .

SFX 1814 N 1
SFX 1814 0 yrie .

SFX 1815 N 1
SFX 1815 0 yuan .

SFX 1816 N 1
SFX 1816 0 z .

SFX 1817 N 1
SFX 1817 0 zal .

SFX 1818 N 1
SFX 1818 0 zan .

SFX 1819 N 1
SFX 1819 0 zán .

SFX 1820 N 1
SFX 1820 0 zbach .

SFX 1821 N 1
SFX 1821 0 zd .

SFX 1822 N 1
SFX 1822 0 zgân .

SFX 1823 N 1
SFX 1823 0 zhi .

SFX 1824 N 1
SFX 1824 0 zhishan .

SFX 1825 N 1
SFX 1825 0 zhong .

SFX 1826 N 1
SFX 1826 0 zhou .

SFX 1827 N 1
SFX 1827 0 zingen .

SFX 1828 N 1
SFX 1828 0 zoo .

SFX 1829 N 1
SFX 1829 0 zourgou .

SFX 1830 N 1
SFX 1830 0 ztergom .

SFX 1831 N 1
SFX 1831 0 zuishan .

SFX 1832 N 1
SFX 1832 0 zuoka .
