Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.dic
Allegan/1799
Arbor/1799
Cotton/1792
Ebon/1808
Evans/1769
Fayette/1769
Frio/1737
Gaines/1769
Hope/1784
Ivano/1771
Kandi/1812
Kerr/1799
Knox/1769
Lewis/1769
Marlboro/1733
Noda/1781
Serra/1760
Soum/1799
Sweet/1780
Ville/1747
